District of Columbia statutes.
16-3908

Judgment for wages; oral examination; payment.

When a judgment rendered in an action pursuant to this chapter is founded in whole or in part on a claim for wages or personal services, the judge shall, upon motion of the party obtaining judgment, order the appearance of the party against whom the judgment has been entered, but not more often than once each week for four weeks, for oral examination under oath as to his financial status and his ability to pay the judgment, and the judge shall make such supplementary orders as seems just and proper to effectuate the payment of the judgment upon reasonable terms.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 611, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-3908.
1973 Ed., § 16-3908.